Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1.1. Medical Care Facilities Certificate of Public Need.

§ 32.1-102.1.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context indicates otherwise:

“Application”
means a prescribed format for the presentation of data and information deemed necessary by the Board to determine a public need for a project.

“Bad debt”
means revenue amounts deemed uncollectable as determined after collection efforts based upon sound credit and collection policies.

“Certificate”
means a certificate of public need for a project required by this article.

“Charity care”
means health care services delivered to a patient who has a family income at or below 200 percent of the federal poverty level and for which it was determined that no payment was expected (i) at the time the service was provided because the patient met the facility’s criteria for the provision of care without charge due to the patient’s status as an indigent person or (ii) at some time following the time the service was provided because the patient met the facility’s criteria for the provision of care without charge due to the patient’s status as an indigent person. “Charity care” does not include care provided for a fee subsequently deemed uncollectable as bad debt. For a nursing home as defined in §

32.1-123

, “charity care” means care at a reduced rate to indigent persons.

“Clinical health service”
means a single diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative, preventive or palliative procedure or a series of such procedures that may be separately identified for billing and accounting purposes.

“Health planning region”
means a contiguous geographical area of the Commonwealth with a population base of at least 500,000 persons which is characterized by the availability of multiple levels of medical care services, reasonable travel time for tertiary care, and congruence with planning districts.

“Project”
means any action described in subsection B of §

32.1-102.1:3

.

“Regional health planning agency”
means the regional agency, including the regional health planning board, its staff and any component thereof, designated by the Virginia Health Planning Board to perform the health planning activities set forth in this chapter within a health planning region.

“State Health Services Plan”
means the planning document adopted by the Board of Health which shall include, but not be limited to, (i) methodologies for projecting need for each type of medical care facility described in subsection A of §

32.1-102.1:3

and each type of project described in subsection B of §

32.1-102.1:3

; (ii) statistical information on the availability of each type of medical care facility described in subsection A of §

32.1-102.1:3

and each type of project described in subsection B of § 32.1-102.1:3; and (iii) procedures, criteria, and standards for review of applications for projects for each type of medical care facility described in subsection A of §

32.1-102.1:3

and each type of project described in subsection B of § 32.1-102.1:3.

History.

1982, c. 388; 1983, c. 533; 1984, c. 740; 1985, c. 513; 1989, c. 517; 1991, c. 561; 1992, c. 612; 1993, c. 704; 1995, c. 524; 1996, c. 1050; 1997, c. 600; 1998, c. 289; 1999, cc. 899, 920, 922; 2000, cc. 850, 920; 2004, c. 75; 2007, c. 502; 2008, c. 664; 2009, cc. 67, 175, 813, 840; 2011, cc. 92, 150; 2012, cc. 476, 492, 507, 803, 835; 2015, cc. 541, 542, 651; 2017, cc. 458, 791; 2020, c. 1271.

Cross references.

As to retiree license for doctors, etc., providing charity care or health services for patients for whom travel is a barrier, § 54.1-2937.1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 541, cl. 2 provides: “That the Secretary of Health and Human Resources shall convene a workgroup that shall include health care providers, consumers of health care services, representatives of the business community, and other stakeholders to review the current certificate of public need process and the impact of such process on health care services in the Commonwealth, and the need for changes to the current certificate of public need process. In conducting such review, the work group shall evaluate: (i) the process by which applications for certificates of public need are reviewed, the criteria upon which decisions about issuance of certificates of public need are based, and barriers to issuance of a certificate of public need; (ii) the frequency with which applications for a certificate are approved or denied; (iii) fees charged for review of applications for a certificate of public need and the cost to the Commonwealth of processing applications for a certificate of public need; (iv) applications for and the impact of the current certificate of public need process on establishment of new health care services, including the establishment of new intermediate-level or specialty-level neonatal special care services and open heart surgery services and the addition of new beds or operating rooms at existing medical care facilities; (v) the relationship between the certificate of public need process and the provision of charity care in the Commonwealth and the impact of the certificate of public need process on the provision of charity care in the Commonwealth; (vi) the impact of the certificate of public need process on graduate medical education programs and teaching hospitals in the Commonwealth; (vii) the efficacy of regional health planning agencies, the role of regional health planning agencies in the certificate of public need process, and barriers to the continued role of regional health planning agencies in the certificate of public need process; and (viii) the frequency with which the State Medical Facilities Plan is updated and whether such plan should be updated more frequently. The work group shall develop specific recommendations for changes to the certificate of public need process to address any problems or challenges identified during such review, which shall include recommendations for changes to the process to be introduced during the 2016 Session of the General Assembly and any additional changes that may require further study or review. In conducting its review and developing its recommendations, the work group shall consider data and information about the current certificate of public need process in the Commonwealth, the impact of such process, and any data or information about similar processes in other states. The Secretary shall report on the recommendations developed by the work group by December 1, 2015.”

Acts 2017, c. 791, cl. 2 provides: “That the Commissioner of Health shall report to the Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations and Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committees on Finance and Education and Health by November 1, 2018, a data analysis comparing the value of (i) the total amount of charity care as defined in §

32.1-102.1

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, that each medical care facility provided to indigent persons; (ii) the number of patients to whom charity care was provided; (iii) the specific services delivered to patients that are reported as charity care recipients; and (iv) the portion of the total amount of charity care provided that each service represents to comply with any conditions on such certificates based on the method utilized for valuing such care as of July 1, 2017, to the medical care facility’s cost using a method established by the nonprofit organization defined in §

32.1-276.3

of the Code of Virginia and to the value of such care based on the provider reimbursement methodology utilized by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for reimbursement under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.”

Acts 2020, c. 1271, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Health develop recommendations to reduce the duration of the average review cycle for applications for certificates of public need to not more than 120 days from the date of receipt of a letter of intent. In doing so, the Department shall consider changes to the current process that may result in a reduction in the duration of the review period, including elimination or revision of the review of applications for completeness, reduction of the current 70-day period for review of an application by the Department, and a requirement that a public hearing be held earlier in the process. The Department shall report its recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly by December 1, 2020.”

Acts 2020, c. 1271, cl. 3 provides: “That the Secretary of Health and Human Resources implement a system by January 1, 2023, or as soon as thereafter as practicable, to ensure that data needed to evaluate whether an application for a certificate of public need is consistent with the State Health Services Plan requirements is timely and reliable, with such funds as are available.”

Acts 2020, c. 1271, cl. 4 provides: “That the Secretary of Health and Human Resources implement a system by January 1, 2021, or as soon thereafter as practicable, to make an inventory of capacity authorized by certificates of public need, both operational and not yet operational, available in a digital format online, with such funds as are available.”

Acts 2020, c. 1271, cl. 5 provides: “That the Secretary of Health and Human Resources establish, by January 1, 2021, a public education and outreach program designed to improve public awareness of the certificate of public need process and the public’s role in such process, including the opportunity to provide written comments on applications and the process by which a member of the public may request a public hearing on an application.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 850 and 920 are identical, and inserted “except for the purpose of nuclear cardiac imaging” near the end of the ninth clause in the paragraph defining “Medical care facility”; added the last sentence in the concluding paragraph under the definition of “Medical care facility”; and inserted “except for the purpose of nuclear cardiac imaging” in the fifth clause in the paragraph defining “Project.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 75, in the definition of “Medical care facility,” added the language beginning “except those intermediate care facilities” at the end of subdivision 4, inserted clause (iii), redesignated former clauses (iii) and (iv) as present clauses (iv) and (iv) and made minor stylistic changes in the first sentence of the last paragraph; and in the definition of “Project,” substituted “10” for “ten” in three places in subdivision 3, substituted “12” for “twelve” in subdivision 5, in subdivision 8, substituted “$5 million” for “five million dollars” in the first and last sentences and substituted “$1” for “one” in the last sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 502, in the definition of “Project,” in subdivision 8, substituted “$15 million” for “$5 million” in the first sentence, substituted “between $5 and $15 million” for “between $1 and $5 million” in the second sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 664, under the definition for “Project,” rewrote subdivision 3.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 67, in the definition of “Medical care facility,” in the first sentence of the last paragraph, added clause (vi) and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment by c. 175, effective March 25, 2009, substituted “stereotactic radiosurgery” for “gamma knife surgery” and inserted “stereotactic radiotherapy, proton beam therapy” following “radiation therapy” in subdivision 9 of the definition of “Medical care facility” and in subdivisions 5 and 7 of the definition of “Project”; in the definition of “Project,” added subdivision 9 and made related changes; and deleted the former definition of “Virginia Health Planning Board,” which read: “’Virginia Health Planning Board’ means the statewide health planning body established pursuant to §

32.1-122.02

which serves as the analytical and technical resource to the Secretary of Health and Human Resources in matters requiring health analysis and planning.”

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and in the definition of “Medical care facility,” substituted “Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “State Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services Board” near the beginning of the first paragraph; substituted “individuals with mental retardation” for “the mentally retarded,” “individuals” for “people” and “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” in subdivision 4; substituted “individuals with substance abuse” for “alcoholics or drug addicts” in subdivision 8; and in the last paragraph, substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” throughout and “individuals with mental retardation” for “the mentally retarded” in clause (iii).

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 92 and 150 are identical, and in the definition for “Medical care facility,” added clause (vii) in the last paragraph and made related changes.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and in the definition of “Medical care facility,” substituted “nonrelated persons who are injured or physically sick or have mental illness” for “nonrelated mentally or physically sick or injured persons” in the first sentence of the introductory paragraph and “with intellectual disability (ICF/MR)” for “with mental retardation” and “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” in paragraph 4; rewrote paragraph 7, which read “Mental retardation facilities”; and in the concluding paragraph, substituted “individuals with intellectual disability (ICF/MR)” for “individuals with mental retardation” and “individuals with intellectual disability” for “people with mental retardation” in clause (iii) and deleted “above” following “described” in clause (iv).

The 2012 amendment by c. 492 substituted “pursuant to a Request for Applications (RFA)” for “under §

32.1-102.3:2

” in subdivision 9 of the definition of “Project.”

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, are identical, and in the definition for “Medical care facility,” in the last paragraph of subsection 11, in clause (iv), deleted “above” following “described,” and in clause (v), substituted “Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “Department of Rehabilitative Services.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 541 and 651 are identical and substituted “does not include” for “shall not include” preceding “not” in the last paragraph of the definition for “medical care facility” and in subdivision 3 of the definition for “Project”; and in subdivision 8 of the definition for “Project,” substituted “on behalf” for “in behalf” substituted “other than a general hospital. Capital expenditures of $5 million or more by a general hospital and” for “However,” inserted “by a medical care facility other than a general hospital” and added the fourth sentence.

The 2015 amendment by c. 542 substituted “Wilson Workforce and Rehabilitation” for “Woodrow Wilson Rehabilitation” in subdivision (v) of the exclusions from the definition of “medical care facility.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 458 substituted “(ICF/IID)” for “(ICF/MR)”, and “developmental disabilities” for “intellectual disability” in the definition of “Medical care facility.”

The 2017 amendment by c. 791 added the definitions for “Bad debt” and “Charity care.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1271 added the definition for “Application”; deleted the definition for “Medical care facility” (see now §

32.1-3

and subsection A of §

32.1-102.1:3

); rewrote the definition for “Project” to refer to subsection B. of
§

32.1-102.1:3

; and in the last definition, substituted “Health Services” for “Medical Facilities” in the defined term and substituted “each type of medical care facility described in subsection A of §

32.1-102.1:3

and each type of project described in subsection B of § 32.1-102.1:3” for “medical care facility beds and services” in clause (i) and for “medical care facilities and services” in clauses (ii) and (iii).

Law Review.

For article, “The Changing Focus of Peer Review under Medicare,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 315 (1986).

As to certificates of public need, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 667 (1988).

For survey of administrative procedure in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 431 (1989).

For 1992 survey of health care law in Virginia, see 26 U. Rich. L. Rev. 759 (1992).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

For annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 473 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Hospitals and Sanitariums, § 3.

§ 32.1-102.1:1.
Equipment registration required.

Within thirty calendar days of becoming contractually obligated to acquire any medical equipment for the provision of cardiac catheterization, computed tomographic (CT) scanning, stereotactic radiosurgery, lithotripsy, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), magnetic source imaging (MSI), open heart surgery, positron emission tomographic (PET) scanning, radiation therapy, stereotactic radiotherapy, proton beam therapy, or other specialized service designated by the Board by regulation, any person shall register such purchase with the Commissioner and the appropriate regional health planning agency.

History.

1999, cc. 899, 922; 2000, c. 931; 2009, c. 175.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 931 substituted “planning” for “systems”.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 175, effective March 25, 2009, substituted “stereotactic radiosurgery” for “gamma knife surgery” and inserted “stereotactic radiotherapy, proton beam therapy” following “radiation therapy” and “regional” preceding “health planning agency.”

§ 32.1-102.1:2.
Certificate of public need required; registration of certain equipment and capital projects required.

No person shall undertake a project described in subsection B of §

32.1-102.1:3

or regulations of the Board at or on behalf of a medical care facility described in subsection A of §

32.1-102.1:3

without first obtaining a certificate from the Commissioner.

No person shall acquire any replacement medical equipment for the provision of cardiac catheterization, computed tomographic (CT) scanning, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), open heart surgery, positron emission tomographic (PET) scanning, radiation therapy, stereotactic radiotherapy other than radiotherapy performed using a linear accelerator or other medical equipment that uses concentrated doses of high-energy X-rays to perform external beam radiation therapy, proton beam therapy, or other specialized service designated by the Board by regulation without first registering such purchase with the Commissioner and the appropriate regional health planning agency. Such registration shall be made at least 30 calendar days prior to the date on which the person will become contractually obligated to acquire such medical equipment.

No general hospital shall make any capital expenditure of $5 million or more and no medical care facility other than a general hospital shall make any capital expenditure between $5 million and the amount established by the Board as the minimum capital expenditure by a medical care facility other than a general hospital for which a certificate is required pursuant to subdivision B 8 of §

32.1-102.1:3

without first registering such capital expenditure with the Commissioner pursuant to regulations of the Board. The amounts specified in this subsection shall be revised annually to reflect inflation using appropriate measures incorporating construction costs and medical inflation.

History.

2020, c. 1271.

§ 32.1-102.1:3.
Medical care facilities and projects for which a certificate is required.

The following medical care facilities shall be subject to the provisions of this article:

Any facility licensed as a hospital, as defined in §

32.1-123

;

Any hospital licensed as a provider by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services in accordance with Article 2 (§

37.2-403

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 37.2;

Any facility licensed as a nursing home, as defined in §

32.1-123

;

Any intermediate care facility established primarily for the medical, psychiatric, or psychological treatment and rehabilitation of individuals with substance abuse licensed by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services in accordance with Article 2 (§

37.2-403

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 37.2;

Any intermediate care facility for individuals with developmental disabilities other than an intermediate care facility established for individuals with intellectual disability (ICF/IID) that has not more than 12 beds and is in an area identified as in need of residential services for individuals with intellectual disability in any plan of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services; and

Any specialized center or clinic or that portion of a physician’s office developed for the provision of outpatient or ambulatory surgery, cardiac catheterization, computed tomographic (CT) scanning, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), positron emission tomographic (PET) scanning, radiation therapy, stereotactic radiotherapy other than radiotherapy performed using a linear accelerator or other medical equipment that uses concentrated doses of high-energy X-rays to perform external beam radiation therapy, or proton beam therapy.

The following actions undertaken by or on behalf of a medical care facility described in subsection A shall constitute a project for which a certificate of public need is required pursuant to subsection A of §

32.1-102.1:2

:

Establishment of a medical care facility described in subsection A;

An increase in the total number of beds or operating rooms in an existing medical care facility described in subsection A;

Relocation of beds from an existing medical care facility described in subsection A to another existing medical care facility described in subsection A;

Addition of any new nursing home service at an existing medical care facility described in subsection A;

Introduction into an existing medical care facility described in subsection A of any cardiac catheterization, computed tomographic (CT) scanning, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), medical rehabilitation, neonatal special care, open heart surgery, positron emission tomographic (PET) scanning, psychiatric, organ or tissue transplant service, radiation therapy, stereotactic radiotherapy other than radiotherapy performed using a linear accelerator or other medical equipment that uses concentrated doses of high-energy X-rays to perform external beam radiation therapy, proton beam therapy, or substance abuse treatment when such medical care facility has not provided such service in the previous 12 months;

Conversion of beds in an existing medical care facility described in subsection A to medical rehabilitation beds or psychiatric beds;

The addition by an existing medical care facility described in subsection A of any new medical equipment for the provision of cardiac catheterization, computed tomographic (CT) scanning, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), open heart surgery, positron emission tomographic (PET) scanning, radiation therapy, stereotactic radiotherapy other than radiotherapy performed using a linear accelerator or other medical equipment that uses concentrated doses of high-energy X-rays to perform external beam radiation therapy, or proton beam therapy, other than new medical equipment for the provision of such service added to replace existing medical equipment for the provision of such service;

Any capital expenditure of $15 million or more, not defined as reviewable in subdivisions 1 through 7, by or on behalf of a medical care facility described in subsection A other than a general hospital. The amounts specified in this subdivision shall be revised annually to reflect inflation using appropriate measures incorporating construction costs and medical inflation. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to modify or eliminate the reviewability of any project described in subdivisions 1 through 7 when undertaken by or on behalf of a general hospital; and

Conversion in an existing medical care facility described in subsection A of psychiatric inpatient beds approved pursuant to a Request for Applications (RFA) to nonpsychiatric inpatient beds.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, any nursing home affiliated with a facility that, on January 1, 1982, and thereafter, (i) is operated as a nonprofit institution, (ii) is licensed jointly by the Department as a nursing home and by the Department of Social Services as an assisted living facility, and (iii) restricts admissions such that (a) admissions to the facility are only allowed pursuant to the terms of a “life care contract” guaranteeing that the full complement of services offered by the facility is available to the resident as and when needed, (b) admissions to the assisted living facility unit of the facility are restricted to individuals defined as ambulatory by the Department of Social Services, and (c) admissions to the nursing home unit of the facility are restricted to those individuals who are residents of the assisted living facility unit of the facility shall not be subject to the requirements of this article.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B, a certificate of public need shall not be required for the following actions undertaken by or on behalf of a medical care facility described in subsection A:

Relocation of up to 10 beds or 10 percent of the beds, whichever is less, (i) from one existing medical care facility described in subsection A to another existing medical care facility described in subsection A at the same site in any two-year period or (ii) in any three-year period, from one existing medical care facility described in subsection A licensed as a nursing home to any other existing medical care facility described in subsection A licensed as a nursing home that is owned or controlled by the same person and located either within the same planning district or within another planning district out of which, during or prior to that three-year period, at least 10 times that number of beds have been authorized by statute to be relocated from one or more medical care facilities described in subsection A located in that other planning district, and at least half of those beds have not been replaced; or

Use of up to 10 percent of beds as nursing home beds by a medical care facility described in subsection A licensed as a hospital, as provided in §

32.1-132

.

The Department shall regularly review the types of medical care facilities subject to the provisions of this article and projects for which a certificate is required and provide to the Governor and the General Assembly, at least once every five years, a recommendation related to the continued appropriateness of requiring such types of medical care facilities to be subject to the provisions of this article and such types of projects to be subject to the requirement of a certificate. In developing such recommendations, the Department shall consider, for each type of medical care facility and project, the following criteria:

The current and projected future availability of the specific type of medical care facility or project;

The current and projected future demand for the specific type of medical care facility or project;

The current and projected future rate of utilization of the specific type of medical care facility or project;

The current and projected future capacity of existing medical care facilities or projects of that specific type;

The anticipated impact of changes in population and demographics, reimbursement structures and rates, and technology on demand for and availability, utilization, and capacity of existing medical care facilities or projects of that specific type;

Existing quality, utilization, and other controls applicable to the specific type of medical care facility or project; and

Any risk to the health or well-being of the public resulting from inclusion of the specific type of medical care facility or project on such list.

History.

2020, c. 1271.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Medical care facility.” —

A freestanding emergency facility that is owned and operated by a licensed hospital is not required to be separately licensed unless it falls within one of the classifications of “hospital” set forth in regulations promulgated by the state Board of Health.
Additionally, the establishment of a freestanding emergency facility is not subject to the issuance of a certificate of public need unless it qualifies as a “medical care facility” under §

32.1-102.1

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable George L. Barker, Member, Senate of Virginia, 18-045, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 6 (3/8/19).